Nebraska, session 109, LB8.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-2715.07, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
77-2715.07 (1) There shall be allowed to qualified resident
individuals as a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit equal to the federal credit allowed under section 22 of
the Internal Revenue Code; and
(b) A credit for taxes paid to another state as provided in section
77-2730.
(2) There shall be allowed to qualified resident individuals against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross incomes of
greater than twenty-nine thousand dollars, a nonrefundable credit equal
to twenty-five percent of the federal credit allowed under section 21 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, except that for taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2015, such
nonrefundable credit shall be allowed only if the individual would have
received the federal credit allowed under section 21 of the code after
adding back in any carryforward of a net operating loss that was deducted
pursuant to such section in determining eligibility for the federal
credit;
(b) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross income of
twenty-nine thousand dollars or less, a refundable credit equal to a
percentage of the federal credit allowable under section 21 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, whether or not the federal
credit was limited by the federal tax liability. The percentage of the
federal credit shall be one hundred percent for incomes not greater than
twenty-two thousand dollars, and the percentage shall be reduced by ten
percent for each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
reported federal adjusted gross income exceeds twenty-two thousand
dollars, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
-2-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if
the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 21 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net
operating loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining
eligibility for the federal credit;
(c) A refundable credit as provided in section 77-5209.01 for
individuals who qualify for an income tax credit as a qualified beginning
farmer or livestock producer under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act
for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2006, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(d) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income
tax credit under the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research
and Development Act, the Reverse Osmosis System Tax Credit Act, or the
Volunteer Emergency Responders Incentive Act; and
(e) A refundable credit equal to ten percent of the federal credit
allowed under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if
the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 32 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net
operating loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining
eligibility for the federal credit.
(3) There shall be allowed to all individuals as a nonrefundable
credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967:
(a) A credit for personal exemptions allowed under section
77-2716.01;
(b) A credit for contributions to programs or projects certified for
tax credit status as provided in the Creating High Impact Economic
Futures Act. Each partner, each shareholder of an electing subchapter S
-3-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
corporation, each beneficiary of an estate or trust, or each member of a
limited liability company shall report his or her share of the credit in
the same manner and proportion as he or she reports the partnership,
subchapter S corporation, estate, trust, or limited liability company
income;
(c) A credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in
section 77-27,236;
(d) A credit as provided in the New Markets Job Growth Investment
Act;
(e) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act;
(f) A credit to employers as provided in sections 77-27,238 and
77-27,240;
(g) A credit as provided in the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act;
(h) A credit to grocery store retailers, restaurants, and
agricultural producers as provided in section 77-27,241;
(i) A credit as provided in the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit
Act;
(i) (j) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Shortline Rail
Modernization Act;
(j) (k) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act; and
(k) (l) A credit as provided in the Caregiver Tax Credit Act.
(4) There shall be allowed as a credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit to all resident estates and trusts for taxes paid to
another state as provided in section 77-2730;
(b) A credit to all estates and trusts for contributions to programs
or projects certified for tax credit status as provided in the Creating
High Impact Economic Futures Act; and
(c) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income
tax credit as an owner of agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer
-4-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
Tax Credit Act for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended. The credit allowed for each partner, shareholder, member, or
beneficiary of a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or
estate or trust qualifying for an income tax credit as an owner of
agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act shall be
equal to the partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion
of the amount of tax credit distributed pursuant to subsection (6) of
section 77-5211.
(5)(a) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007,
and before January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, there shall be allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or
beneficiary of a partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability
company, or estate or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal to fifty percent of the
partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion of the
amount of franchise tax paid to the state under sections 77-3801 to
77-3807 by a financial institution.
(b) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, there shall be
allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of a
partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability company, or
estate or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal to the partner's, shareholder's,
member's, or beneficiary's portion of the amount of franchise tax paid to
the state under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 by a financial institution.
(c) Each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary shall report
his or her share of the credit in the same manner and proportion as he or
she reports the partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability
company, or estate or trust income. If any partner, shareholder, member,
or beneficiary cannot fully utilize the credit for that year, the credit
-5-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
may not be carried forward or back.
(6) There shall be allowed to all individuals nonrefundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-3604 and refundable credits against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section
77-3605.
(7)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a nonrefundable credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 in the amount of five
thousand dollars shall be allowed to any individual who purchases a
residence during the taxable year if such residence:
(i) Is located within an area that has been declared an extremely
blighted area under section 18-2101.02;
(ii) Is the individual's primary residence; and
(iii) Was not purchased from a family member of the individual or a
family member of the individual's spouse.
(b) The credit provided in this subsection shall be claimed for the
taxable year in which the residence is purchased. If the individual
cannot fully utilize the credit for such year, the credit may be carried
forward to subsequent taxable years until fully utilized.
(c) No more than one credit may be claimed under this subsection
with respect to a single residence.
(d) The credit provided in this subsection shall be subject to
recapture by the Department of Revenue if the individual claiming the
credit sells or otherwise transfers the residence or quits using the
residence as his or her primary residence within five years after the end
of the taxable year in which the credit was claimed.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, family member means an
individual's spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, or
grandparent, whether by blood, marriage, or adoption.
-6-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
(8) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Property Tax Incentive Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, and the
Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act, and the Sustainable
Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act.
(9)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a
refundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 shall be allowed to the parent of a stillborn child if:
(i) A fetal death certificate is filed pursuant to subsection (1) of
section 71-606 for such child;
(ii) Such child had advanced to at least the twentieth week of
gestation; and
(iii) Such child would have been a dependent of the individual
claiming the credit.
(b) The amount of the credit shall be two thousand dollars.
(c) The credit shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the
stillbirth occurred.
(10) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-7203 and nonrefundable credits against the income
tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section
77-7204.
(11) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-3157 and nonrefundable credits against the income
tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in sections
77-3156, 77-3158, and 77-3159.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2717, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-7-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
77-2717 (1)(a)(i) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
before January 1, 2014, the tax imposed on all resident estates and
trusts shall be a percentage of the federal taxable income of such
estates and trusts as modified in section 77-2716, plus a percentage of
the federal alternative minimum tax and the federal tax on premature or
lump-sum distributions from qualified retirement plans. The additional
taxes shall be recomputed by (A) substituting Nebraska taxable income for
federal taxable income, (B) calculating what the federal alternative
minimum tax would be on Nebraska taxable income and adjusting such
calculations for any items which are reflected differently in the
determination of federal taxable income, and (C) applying Nebraska rates
to the result. The federal credit for prior year minimum tax, after the
recomputations required by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, and the
credits provided in the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act
and the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act shall be allowed
as a reduction in the income tax due. A refundable income tax credit
shall be allowed for all resident estates and trusts under the Angel
Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax
Credit Act, and the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act. A
nonrefundable income tax credit shall be allowed for all resident estates
and trusts as provided in the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act.
(ii) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2014, the tax imposed on all resident estates and trusts shall
be a percentage of the federal taxable income of such estates and trusts
as modified in section 77-2716, plus a percentage of the federal tax on
premature or lump-sum distributions from qualified retirement plans. The
additional taxes shall be recomputed by substituting Nebraska taxable
income for federal taxable income and applying Nebraska rates to the
result. The credits provided in the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise
Tax Credit Act and the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act
-8-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
shall be allowed as a reduction in the income tax due. A refundable
income tax credit shall be allowed for all resident estates and trusts
under the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska
Act, the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Advantage Research and Development Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit
Act, the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax
Incentive Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical
Production Tax Credit Act, and the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit
Act. A nonrefundable income tax credit shall be allowed for all resident
estates and trusts as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and
Mainstreet Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act,
the School Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the
Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Nebraska
Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities Support Act, and sections 77-27,238, 77-27,240, and
77-27,241.
(b) The tax imposed on all nonresident estates and trusts shall be
the portion of the tax imposed on resident estates and trusts which is
attributable to the income derived from sources within this state. The
tax which is attributable to income derived from sources within this
state shall be determined by multiplying the liability to this state for
a resident estate or trust with the same total income by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the nonresident estate's or trust's Nebraska income
as determined by sections 77-2724 and 77-2725 and the denominator of
which is its total federal income after first adjusting each by the
amounts provided in section 77-2716. The federal credit for prior year
minimum tax, after the recomputations required by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, reduced by the percentage of the total income which is
attributable to income from sources outside this state, and the credits
provided in the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act and the
-9-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act shall be allowed as a
reduction in the income tax due. A refundable income tax credit shall be
allowed for all nonresident estates and trusts under the Angel Investment
Tax Credit Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Advantage
Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and
Development Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical Production Tax
Credit Act, and the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act. A
nonrefundable income tax credit shall be allowed for all nonresident
estates and trusts as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and
Mainstreet Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act,
the School Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the
Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Nebraska
Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities Support Act, and sections 77-27,238, 77-27,240, and
77-27,241.
(2) In all instances wherein a fiduciary income tax return is
required under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, a Nebraska
fiduciary return shall be filed, except that a fiduciary return shall not
be required to be filed regarding a simple trust if all of the trust's
beneficiaries are residents of the State of Nebraska, all of the trust's
income is derived from sources in this state, and the trust has no
federal tax liability. The fiduciary shall be responsible for making the
return for the estate or trust for which he or she acts, whether the
income be taxable to the estate or trust or to the beneficiaries thereof.
The fiduciary shall include in the return a statement of each
beneficiary's distributive share of net income when such income is
taxable to such beneficiaries.
(3) The beneficiaries of such estate or trust who are residents of
-10-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
this state shall include in their income their proportionate share of
such estate's or trust's federal income and shall reduce their Nebraska
tax liability by their proportionate share of the credits as provided in
the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage
Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and
Development Act, the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization
Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School Readiness Tax
Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable Housing Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Higher
Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
Relocation Incentive Act, the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit
Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Shortline
Rail Modernization Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska
Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities Support Act, and sections 77-27,238, 77-27,240, and
77-27,241. There shall be allowed to a beneficiary a refundable income
tax credit under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act for all taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2001, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) If any beneficiary of such estate or trust is a nonresident
during any part of the estate's or trust's taxable year, he or she shall
file a Nebraska income tax return which shall include (a) in Nebraska
adjusted gross income that portion of the estate's or trust's Nebraska
income, as determined under sections 77-2724 and 77-2725, allocable to
his or her interest in the estate or trust and (b) a reduction of the
Nebraska tax liability by his or her proportionate share of the credits
as provided in the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research
and Development Act, the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School
Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable
-11-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
Housing Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the
Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive
Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, the Renewable Chemical Production Tax
Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the
Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and
Developmental Disabilities Support Act, and sections 77-27,238,
77-27,240, and 77-27,241 and shall execute and forward to the fiduciary,
on or before the original due date of the Nebraska fiduciary return, an
agreement which states that he or she will file a Nebraska income tax
return and pay income tax on all income derived from or connected with
sources in this state, and such agreement shall be attached to the
Nebraska fiduciary return for such taxable year.
(5) In the absence of the nonresident beneficiary's executed
agreement being attached to the Nebraska fiduciary return, the estate or
trust shall remit a portion of such beneficiary's income which was
derived from or attributable to Nebraska sources with its Nebraska return
for the taxable year. For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
before January 1, 2013, the amount of remittance, in such instance, shall
be the highest individual income tax rate determined under section
77-2715.02 multiplied by the nonresident beneficiary's share of the
estate or trust income which was derived from or attributable to sources
within this state. For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2013, the amount of remittance, in such instance, shall
be the highest individual income tax rate determined under section
77-2715.03 multiplied by the nonresident beneficiary's share of the
estate or trust income which was derived from or attributable to sources
within this state. The amount remitted shall be allowed as a credit
against the Nebraska income tax liability of the beneficiary.
(6) The Tax Commissioner may allow a nonresident beneficiary to not
file a Nebraska income tax return if the nonresident beneficiary's only
-12-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
source of Nebraska income was his or her share of the estate's or trust's
income which was derived from or attributable to sources within this
state, the nonresident did not file an agreement to file a Nebraska
income tax return, and the estate or trust has remitted the amount
required by subsection (5) of this section on behalf of such nonresident
beneficiary. The amount remitted shall be retained in satisfaction of the
Nebraska income tax liability of the nonresident beneficiary.
(7) For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, simple trust shall mean any trust instrument which (a) requires
that all income shall be distributed currently to the beneficiaries, (b)
does not allow amounts to be paid, permanently set aside, or used in the
tax year for charitable purposes, and (c) does not distribute amounts
allocated in the corpus of the trust. Any trust which does not qualify as
a simple trust shall be deemed a complex trust.
(8) For purposes of this section, any beneficiary of an estate or
trust that is a grantor trust of a nonresident shall be disregarded and
this section shall apply as though the nonresident grantor was the
beneficiary.
Sec. 3. Section 77-2734.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2734.03 (1)(a) For taxable years commencing prior to January 1,
1997, any (i) insurer paying a tax on premiums and assessments pursuant
to section 77-908 or 81-523, (ii) electric cooperative organized under
the Joint Public Power Authority Act, or (iii) credit union shall be
credited, in the computation of the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, with the amount paid during the taxable year as taxes on
such premiums and assessments and taxes in lieu of intangible tax.
(b) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 1997, any
insurer paying a tax on premiums and assessments pursuant to section
77-908 or 81-523, any electric cooperative organized under the Joint
Public Power Authority Act, or any credit union shall be credited, in the
-13-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
computation of the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with
the amount paid during the taxable year as (i) taxes on such premiums and
assessments included as Nebraska premiums and assessments under section
77-2734.05 and (ii) taxes in lieu of intangible tax.
(c) For taxable years commencing or deemed to commence prior to, on,
or after January 1, 1998, any insurer paying a tax on premiums and
assessments pursuant to section 77-908 or 81-523 shall be credited, in
the computation of the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967,
with the amount paid during the taxable year as assessments allowed as an
offset against premium and related retaliatory tax liability pursuant to
section 44-4233.
(2) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a tax credit for
contributions to programs or projects certified for tax credit status as
provided in the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act.
(3) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a refundable
income tax credit under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act for all
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2001,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) The changes made to this section by Laws 2004, LB 983, apply to
motor fuels purchased during any tax year ending or deemed to end on or
after January 1, 2005, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended.
(5) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers refundable income
tax credits under the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act,
the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and
Development Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical Production Tax
Credit Act, and the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act.
(6) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a nonrefundable
income tax credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in
-14-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
section 77-27,236.
(7) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a nonrefundable
income tax credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School
Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable
Housing Tax Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the
Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Nebraska Pregnancy Help
Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Support Act, and sections 77-27,238, 77-27,240, and 77-27,241.
Sec. 4. Section 77-7019, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-7019 (1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2028 2027, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, there shall be allowed a credit against the income tax imposed
by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or any tax imposed pursuant to
sections 77-907 to 77-918 or 77-3801 to 77-3807 to any producer of
sustainable aviation fuel for any sale or use of a qualified mixture.
(2) The credit shall be a refundable nonrefundable credit and the
amount of the credit shall be equal to the number of gallons of
sustainable aviation fuel in all sold or used qualified mixtures
multiplied by the sum of seventy-five cents plus the applicable
supplementary amount.
(3) In order to qualify for the credit under this section, a
producer of sustainable aviation fuel shall:
(a) Register with the department as a producer of sustainable
aviation fuel; and
(b) Provide:
(i) Certification in such form and manner as prescribed by the
department from an unrelated party demonstrating compliance with:
(A) Any general requirements, supply chain traceability
requirements, and information transmission requirements established under
-15-

LB8 LB8
2025 2025
the Carbon Offsetting and Reduction Scheme for International Aviation
described in subdivision (5)(a) of section 77-7018; or
(B) In the case of any methodology described in subdivision (5)(b)
of section 77-7018, requirements similar to the requirements described in
subdivision (3)(b)(i)(A) of this section; and
(ii) Any other information the department may require.
(4) A producer of sustainable aviation fuel shall only claim the
credit under this section in a total of five taxable years.
(4) (5) A producer of sustainable aviation fuel shall apply for the
credit provided in this section by submitting an application to the
department on a form prescribed by the department. The department shall
consider applications in the order in which they are received. If Subject
to subsection (6) of this section, if the department determines that the
producer of sustainable aviation fuel qualifies for tax credits under
this section, the department shall approve the application and certify
the amount of credits approved to the producer of sustainable aviation
fuel.
(6) The department shall consider applications in the order in which
they are received and may approve tax credits under this section in any
fiscal year until the aggregate limit allowed under subsection (7) of
this section has been reached.
(7) The department may approve tax credits under this section each
fiscal year until the total amount of credits approved for the fiscal
year reaches five hundred thousand dollars.
(5) (8) A producer of sustainable aviation fuel shall claim any tax
credits granted under this section by attaching the tax credit
certification received from the department under subsection (4) (5) of
this section to the producer's tax return.
Sec. 5. Original sections 77-2715.07, 77-2717, 77-2734.03, and
77-7019, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-16-